Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-3853
(UTC 601) Capacity of settlor of revocable trust.

(UTC 601) The capacity required to create, amend, revoke, or add property to a revocable trust, or to direct the actions of the trustee of a revocable trust, is the same as that required to make a will.

Laws 2003, LB 130, § 53.